Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3420
Provisional license; requirements;
renewal; expiration; conditions; application for extension; requirements.

(1) The department, on the
recommendation of the state board, may issue a provisional license to practice
genetic counseling to an individual who meets all of the requirements for
licensure under the Genetic Counseling Practice Act except for certification
and who has been granted active candidate status. Such license shall be valid
for one year from the date of issuance and may be renewed for one additional
year if the applicant fails the certification examination one time. The provisional
license shall expire automatically upon the earliest of the following:

(a) Issuance of a license
as a genetic counselor under the Genetic Counseling Practice Act;

(b) Thirty days after the
applicant fails to pass the complete certification examination; or

(c) The date printed on
the provisional license.

(2)
An application for extension of a provisional license shall be signed by a
qualified supervisor. A provisional licensee shall work at all times under
the supervision of a qualified supervisor.

Laws 2012, LB831, § 20.